District of Columbia statutes.
44-610

Rules.

The requirements of this chapter shall become fully operative on October 23, 1997, without adoption by the Attorney General for the District of Columbia of implementing regulations. In its discretion, the Attorney General for the District of Columbia may issue emergency or proposed rules to implement the provisions of this chapter. The proposed rules, if issued, shall be submitted to the Council for a 45-day period of review, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, legal holidays, and days of Council recess. If the Council does not approve or disapprove the proposed rules within the 45-day period, the proposed rules shall be deemed approved.

History

Oct. 23, 1997, D.C. Law 12-32, § 11, 44 DCR 4819
Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-354, § 66, 52 DCR 2638

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 32-560.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 15-354 substituted “Attorney General for the District of Columbia” for “Corporation Counsel”.